Georgia, session 2025_26, HB687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
security deposits, is amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 44-7-33, relating
to lists of existing defects and of damages during tenancy, inspection of premises by landlord
upon termination of lease and vacation or surrender of premises, right of tenant to inspect and
dissent, and action to recover security deposit, as follows:
"(a) Prior to tendering a security deposit, the tenant shall be presented with a
comprehensive list of any existing damage to the premises and shall include an itemization
of all fees associated with such tenant's lease, which shall be for the tenant's permanent
retention. The tenant shall have the right to inspect the premises to ascertain the accuracy
H. B. 687
- 1 -

LC 48 1490
of such list prior to taking occupancy. The landlord and the tenant shall sign the list, and
this shall be conclusive evidence of the accuracy of the list but shall not be conclusive as
to latent defects. If the tenant refuses to sign the list, the tenant shall state specifically in
writing the items on such list to which he or she dissents and shall sign such statement of
dissent."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 687
- 2 -